Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2109
Tax; persons interested in the estate or transfer, defined.

For purposes of sections 77-2108 to 77-2112, persons interested in the estate or transfer shall, with respect to both state and federal taxes, include all persons who may be entitled to receive or who have received any property or interest which is so required to be included in the gross estate of a decedent or total amount of the generation-skipping transfer or any benefit whatsoever with respect to any such property or interest, whether under a will or intestacy or by reason of any transfer, trust, estate, interest, right, power, relinquishment of power, or otherwise, taxable under either state or federal estate or generation-skipping transfer tax laws.

Laws 1949, c. 222, § 2, p. 625;

Laws 1992, LB 1004, § 14.